Illinois, session 104th, SB3073.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 4-109 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/4-109)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 4-109)7    Sec. 4-109. Pension. 8    (a) A firefighter age 50 or more with 20 or more years of 9creditable service, who is no longer in service as a 10firefighter, shall receive a monthly pension of 1/2 the 11monthly salary attached to the rank held by him or her in the 12fire service at the date of retirement.13    The monthly pension shall be increased by 1/12 of 2.5% of 14such monthly salary for each additional month over 20 years of 15service through 30 years of service, to a maximum of 75% of 16such monthly salary.17    The changes made to this subsection (a) by this amendatory 18Act of the 91st General Assembly apply to all pensions that 19become payable under this subsection on or after January 1, 201999. All pensions payable under this subsection that began on 21or after January 1, 1999 and before the effective date of this 22amendatory Act shall be recalculated, and the amount of the 23increase accruing for that period shall be payable to the   SB3073- 2 -LRB104 14362 RPS 27496 b1pensioner in a lump sum.2    (b) A firefighter who retires or is separated from service 3having at least 10 but less than 20 years of creditable 4service, who is not entitled to receive a disability pension, 5and who did not apply for a refund of contributions at his or 6her last separation from service shall receive a monthly 7pension upon attainment of age 60 based on the monthly salary 8attached to his or her rank in the fire service on the date of 9retirement or separation from service according to the 10following schedule:11    For 10 years of service, 15% of salary; 12    For 11 years of service, 17.6% of salary; 13    For 12 years of service, 20.4% of salary; 14    For 13 years of service, 23.4% of salary; 15    For 14 years of service, 26.6% of salary; 16    For 15 years of service, 30% of salary; 17    For 16 years of service, 33.6% of salary; 18    For 17 years of service, 37.4% of salary; 19    For 18 years of service, 41.4% of salary; 20    For 19 years of service, 45.6% of salary.21    (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, 22the provisions of this subsection (c) apply to a person who 23first becomes a firefighter under this Article on or after 24January 1, 2011.25    A firefighter age 55 or more who has 10 or more years of 26service in that capacity shall be entitled at his option to   SB3073- 3 -LRB104 14362 RPS 27496 b1receive a monthly pension for his service as a firefighter 2computed by multiplying 2.5% for each year of such service by 3his or her final average salary.4    The pension of a firefighter who is retiring after 5attaining age 50 with 10 or more years of creditable service 6shall be reduced by one-half of 1% for each month that the 7firefighter's age is under age 55.8    The maximum pension under this subsection (c) shall be 75% 9of final average salary.10    For the purposes of this subsection (c), "final average 11salary" means the greater of: (i) the average monthly salary 12obtained by dividing the total salary of the firefighter 13during the 48 consecutive months of service within the last 60 14months of service in which the total salary was the highest by 15the number of months of service in that period; or (ii) the 16average monthly salary obtained by dividing the total salary 17of the firefighter during the 96 consecutive months of service 18within the last 120 months of service in which the total salary 19was the highest by the number of months of service in that 20period. 21    Beginning on January 1, 2011, for all purposes under this 22Code (including without limitation the calculation of benefits 23and employee contributions), the annual salary based on the 24plan year of a member or participant to whom this Section 25applies shall not exceed $106,800; however, that amount shall 26annually thereafter be increased by the lesser of (i) 3% of   SB3073- 4 -LRB104 14362 RPS 27496 b1that amount, including all previous adjustments, or (ii) the 2annual unadjusted percentage increase (but not less than zero) 3in the consumer price index-u for the 12 months ending with the 4September preceding each November 1, including all previous 5adjustments. 6    Nothing in this amendatory Act of the 101st General 7Assembly shall cause or otherwise result in any retroactive 8adjustment of any employee contributions. 9    (d) A firefighter who previously participated in the 10Illinois Municipal Retirement Fund (IMRF) for service as a 11member of the fire department of a municipality and was 12transferred to that municipality's firefighters' pension fund 13upon its creation, as required under this Article as a result 14of the federal decennial census of 2010, shall, for the 15purposes of determining the applicable tier of benefits under 16this Article, be deemed to have become a firefighter and 17member of that municipality's firefighters' pension fund on 18the date that he or she first participated in IMRF as a member 19of the fire department of that municipality, notwithstanding 20whether that start date was before January 1, 2011. 21(Source: P.A. 101-610, eff. 1-1-20.) 22    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 23Section 8.49 as follows: 24    (30 ILCS 805/8.49 new)  SB3073- 5 -LRB104 14362 RPS 27496 b1    Sec. 8.49. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 28 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 3the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 4Act of the 104th General Assembly. 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.